District of Columbia statutes.
31-2011

Immunity.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, the Commissioner or the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking or its employees or agents for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this chapter.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-233, § 12, 44 DCR 765
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(l)(3), 51 DCR 2817

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4611.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-166 substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(l)(3) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).